test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-mihkwaw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mihkwâw - ok : # Ordinary VII base on Wolvengrey
     mihkwâw+V+II: mihkwâw
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mihkwâw
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mihkwâwa
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Sg: mihkwâyiw
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prs+4Pl: mihkwâyiwa

     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-mihkwâw, kîmihkwâw]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-mihkwâwa, kîmihkwâwa]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prt+4Sg: [kî-mihkwâyiw, kîmihkwâyiw]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Ind+Prt+4Pl: [kî-mihkwâyiwa, kîmihkwâyiwa]


     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mihkwâk, êmihkwâk]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mihkwâki, êmihkwâki]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Sg: [ê-mihkwâyik, êmihkwâyik]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prs+4Pl: [ê-mihkwâyiki, êmihkwâyiki]

     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [ê-kî-mihkwâk, êkîmihkwâk, ê-kîmihkwâk, êkî-mihkwâk]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [ê-kî-mihkwâki, êkîmihkwâki, ê-kîmihkwâki, êkî-mihkwâki]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prt+4Sg: [ê-kî-mihkwâyik, êkîmihkwâyik, ê-kîmihkwâyik, êkî-mihkwâyik]
     mihkwâw+V+II+Cnj+Prt+4Pl: [ê-kî-mihkwâyiki, êkîmihkwâyiki, ê-kîmihkwâyiki, êkî-mihkwâyiki]
